Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.604.901

Construction—Limitations.

This chapter shall not be construed to:

(1) Impose a duty upon a provider of an interactive computer service, as defined in 47 U.S.C. Sec. 230, to review or enforce compliance with this section by third-party content providers;

(2) Apply to general audience internet websites, general audience mobile applications, or general audience online services even if login credentials created for a school service provider's website, mobile application, or online service may be used to access those general audience websites, mobile applications, or online services;

(3) Impede the ability of students to download, export, or otherwise save or maintain their own student data or documents;

(4) Limit internet service providers from providing internet connectivity to schools or students and their families;

(5) Prohibit a school service provider from marketing educational products directly to parents so long as the marketing did not result from use of student personal information obtained by the school service provider through the provision of its website, mobile application, or online service; or

(6) Impose a duty on a school service provider of an electronic store, gateway, marketplace, or other means of purchasing or downloading software or applications to review or enforce compliance with this chapter on those applications or software.

[ 2015 c 277 s 8.]